District of Columbia statutes.
1-105

Former corporation continued for certain purposes.

The corporation of the District of Columbia is continued for all the purposes of this section and other acts, for the collection of taxes, for suing and being sued, for causes arising prior to June 20, 1874, and for acquiring and holding real estate for school and municipal purposes.

Mar. 3, 1877, 19 Stat. 402, ch. 117, § 15
Control of school buildings, see § 38-401.
This section is referenced in § 38-401.
1981 Ed., § 1-105.
1973 Ed., § 1-105.